Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-411
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 51-411 to 51-418, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Print shall include all forms of printing and duplicating, regardless of format or purpose, with the exception of correspondence and interoffice memoranda;

(2) State publications shall include any multiply produced publications printed or purchased for distribution by the state, the Legislature, constitutional officers, any state department or committee, or any other state agency supported wholly or in part by state funds;

(3) State agency shall include every state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, commission, and agency of the state and, when applicable, all subdivisions of each, including state institutions of higher education defined as all state-supported colleges and universities; and

(4) Governmental publications shall include any publications of associations, regional organizations, intergovernmental bodies, federal agencies, boards, and commissions, or other publishers that may contribute supplementary materials to support the work of the state Legislature and state agencies.

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 3.